Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-501.01
Fire insurance policies; statement as to coverage of loss by nuclear reaction, nuclear radiation, or radioactive contamination.

Insurers issuing the standard policy pursuant to section 44-501 are hereby authorized to affix thereto or include therein, subject to the approval of the Director of Insurance, a written statement that the policy does not cover loss or damage caused by nuclear reaction, nuclear radiation or radioactive contamination, all whether directly or indirectly resulting from an insured peril under said policy; Provided, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit the attachment to any such policy of an endorsement or endorsements specifically assuming coverage for loss or damage caused by nuclear reaction or nuclear radiation or radioactive contamination.

Laws 1959, c. 208, § 1, p. 727.